Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,219
Snowmobiles; records.

The department shall keep a record of each snowmobile registered, employing such methods and practices as may be necessary to maintain an accurate record.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 219.